ro-RO: Mod de curățare: Copil; Curățare; Personalizat; Curățare profundă; Masaj; Normal; Impuls; Sensibil; Moale; Albire; Altele
zh-TW: 清潔模式: 兒童; 清潔; 客製化; 深層清潔; 按摩; 中性; 脈衝; 敏感; 柔軟; 美白; 其他
cs: Čisticí režim: Dětský; Čištění; Vlastní; Hloubkové čištění; Masážní; Normální; Pulzní; Citlivý; Měkká; Bělicí; Jiné
ko: 청소 모드: 어린이; 클린; 커스텀; 딥 클린; 마사지; 일반; 펄스; 민감성; 부드러움; 미백; 기타
lt-LT: Valymo režimas: Vaikas; Valymas; Pasirinktinis; Gilus valymas; Masažinis; Normali; Impulsų; Jautri; Švelnus; Balinamoji; Kita
ru: Режим чистки: Детский; Чистка; Индивидуальный; Глубокая чистка; Для массажа; Нормальная; Импульсный; Чувствительная; Мягкий; Отбеливание; Другой
pt-BR: Modo de limpeza: Infantil; Limpeza; Personalizada; Limpeza profunda; Massagem; Normal; Pulso; Sensível; Macio; Branqueamento; Outro
nb: Rensemodus: Barn; Ren; Tilpasset; Grundig rengjøring; Massasje; Normal; Puls; Sensitiv; Myk; Blekende; Annet
pt-PT: Modo de limpeza: Criança; Limpo; À medida; Limpeza profunda; Massagem; Normal; Pulso; Sensível; Suave; Branqueadora; Outro
ja: クリーニングモード: 子供; クリーン; カスタム; ディープクリーン; マッサージ; 普通; パルス; 敏感; ソフト; ホワイトニング; その他
vi: Chế độ làm sạch: Trẻ em; Làm sạch; Tùy chỉnh; Làm sạch sâu; Mát xa; Da thường; Xung; Da nhạy cảm; Mềm; Kem đánh răng làm trắng; Khác
hr-HR: Način čišćenja: Dječji; Čišćenje; Prilagođeni; Dubinsko čišćenje; Masaža; Normalna; Pulsni; Osjetljiva; Meka; Izbjeljivanje; Ostalo
it: Modalità di pulizia: Bambini; Pulizia; Personalizzato; Pulizia profonda; Massaggio; Normale; Rettangolare; Sensibile; Morbida; Sbiancante; Altro
nl: Reinigingsmodus: Kind; Schoon; Aangepast; Diep reinigen; Massage; Normaal; Puls; Gevoelig; Zacht; Witmakend; Andere
sl-SI: Način čiščenja: Otroški; Čisto; Po meri; Globinsko čiščenje; Masaža; Normalna; Pulzno; Občutljiva; Mehka; Beljenje; Drugo
sv: Rengöringsläge: Barn; Ren; Anpassad; Djuprengöring; Massage; Normalt; Puls; Känsligt; Mjuk; Blekning; Övrigt
hu: Tisztítási mód: Gyermek; Tisztítás; Egyedi; Mélytisztítás; Masszázs; Normál; Impulzus; Érzékeny; Lágy; Fehérítés; Egyéb
da: Rengøringstilstand: Barn; Ren; Skræddersyet; Dybdegående rengøring; Massage; Normalt; Puls; Sensitiv; Blød; Blegende; Andet
de: Reinigungsmodus: Kind; Reinigung; Maßgeschneidert; Tiefenreinigung; Massage; Normal; Impuls; Empfindlich; Weich; Aufhellend; Sonstiges
fr: Mode de nettoyage: Enfant; Nettoyage; Personnalisé; Nettoyage en profondeur; Massage; Normale; Impulsion; Sensible; Doux; Blanchissant; Autre
tr: Temizleme modu: Çocuk; Temizleme; Özel; Derin temizlik; Masaj; Normal; Nabız; Hassas; Yumuşak; Beyazlatıcı; Diğer
fi: Puhdistustila: Lapsi; Puhdistus; Mukautettu; Syväpuhdistus; Hieronta; Normaali; Pulssi; Herkkä; Pehmeä; Valkaiseva; Muu
bg-BG: Режим на почистване: Детски; Почистване; Персонализиран; Дълбоко почистване; Масаж; Нормална; Импулс; Чувствителна; Мека; Избелващa; Други
pl: Tryb czyszczenia: Dziecięcy; Czyszczenie; Niestandardowe terminy; Głębokie czyszczenie; Masaż; Normalny; Impulsowa; Wrażliwe; Miękki; Wybielanie; Inne
en: Cleaning mode: Child; Clean; Custom; Deep Clean; Massage; Normal; Pulse; Sensitive; Soft; Whitening; Other
sk-SK: Čistiaci režim: Detský; Čistenie; Prispôsobený; Hĺbkové čistenie; Masážny; Normálny; Pulz; Citlivý; Mäkký; Bielenie; Iné
es: Modo de limpieza: Niño; Limpieza; Personalizado; Limpieza profunda; Masaje; Normal; Impulso; Sensible; Blando; Blanqueamiento; Otros
th: โหมดทำความสะอาด: เด็ก; ทำความสะอาด; ปรับเข้ารูป; ทำความสะอาดล้ำลึก; การนวด; ผิวปกติ; รูปแบบคลื่น; แพ้ง่าย; นุ่ม; ไวท์เทนนิ่ง; อื่นๆ
el: Λειτουργία καθαρισμού: Παιδικό; Καθαρισμός; Custom; Βαθύς καθαρισμός; Μασάζ; Κανονικός; Σφυγμός; Ευαίσθητο στην υπεριώδη ακτινοβολία; Μαλακό; Λεύκανση; Άλλο
zh-CN: 清洁模式: 儿童模式; 清洁; 定制; 深层清洁; 按摩; 普通; 脉冲; 敏感; 软; 美白; 其他